Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5913YH (8) 91 da/js H.F. 2402 Section 1. Section 169.3, subsection 11, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) âPractice of veterinary medicineâ does not include 3 providing authorized veterinary medical services to an animal 4 patient by veterinary auxiliary personnel when performing 5 a delegated task under the supervision of a supervising 6 veterinarian as provided in subchapter II . 7 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not prevent a registered 8 veterinary technician from administering a rabies vaccine, if 9 the registered veterinary technician performs the task under 10 the supervision of a supervising veterinarian as provided in 11 subchapter II. 12 Sec. 2. Section 351.35, Code 2026, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 351.35 How and when Procedures . 15 1. The rabies vaccination required by section 351.33 shall 16 be an injection of antirabies vaccine approved by the state 17 department of agriculture and land stewardship , and the . The 18 department may provide for the frequency of any necessary 19 revaccination necessary for approved vaccinations shall be as 20 established by such department . 21 2. The vaccine described in subsection 1 shall be 22 administered by a any of the following: 23 a. A licensed veterinarian and acting under chapter 169. 24 b. A registered veterinary technician performing the 25 task under the supervision of a supervising veterinarian as 26 described in chapter 169, subchapter II. 27 3. The vaccine described in subsection 1 shall be given as 28 administered in a manner approved by the state department of 29 agriculture and land stewardship. 30 4. The licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary 31 technician shall issue a tag with the certificate of 32 vaccination, and such tag shall at all times be attached to the 33 collar of the dog. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 5913YH (8) 91 da/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2402 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 BILLâS PROVISIONS. This bill provides that a registered 3 veterinary technician acting under the supervision of 4 a licensed veterinarian (referred to as a supervising 5 veterinarian) may administer a rabies vaccination to an animal. 6 BACKGROUND. Code chapter 169 regulates the practice of 7 veterinary medicine by an individual who has received a doctor 8 of veterinary medicine degree or equivalent and is licensed 9 by the Iowa board of veterinary medicine (board). Generally, 10 a person who is not a licensed veterinarian cannot practice 11 veterinary medicine. The practice of veterinary medicine 12 includes the prescription or administration of any drug. 13 Certain individuals who are not veterinarians (veterinary 14 auxiliary personnel) may perform delegated tasks under 15 different levels of supervision by a supervising veterinarian, 16 including direct supervision (when the veterinarian is readily 17 available on the premises), intermediate supervision (when the 18 veterinarian is within audible and visual range), and indirect 19 supervision (when the veterinarian has provided written 20 instruction for an animalâs treatment and is readily available 21 by telephone or other means of immediate communication). 22 One type of veterinary auxiliary personnel is a veterinary 23 technician who has graduated from an accredited or approved 24 veterinary technology program, has received a passing score 25 on a national veterinarian technician examination, and is 26 issued a certificate of registration by the board (Code section 27 169.34). Code chapter 351 requires dogs to be administered a 28 rabies vaccination (Code section 351.35) and administered an 29 antirabies vaccine approved by the department of agriculture 30 and land stewardship (Code section 169.36). 31 -2- LSB 5913YH (8) 91 da/js 2/ 2